District of Columbia statutes.
42-3505.05

Prohibition of discrimination against elderly tenants or families with children.

(a)

It is unlawful for a housing provider to discriminate against families receiving or eligible to receive Tenant Assistance Program assistance, elderly tenants, or families with children when renting housing accommodations.

(b)

Any protections provided by subsection (a) of this section and any penalties provided in § 42-3509.01 shall be in addition to any other provision of law.

(c)

Allegations of violations of this section that are made by families receiving or eligible to receive Tenant Assistance Program assistance, by elderly tenants, or by families with children shall be promptly investigated and handled by the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs, which shall provide the complaining party with a written report upon the conclusion of the investigation.

July 17, 1985, D.C. Law 6-10, § 505, 32 DCR 3089
Oct. 2, 1987, D.C. Law 7-30, § 4, 34 DCR 5304
Discriminatory practices in real estate transactions, see § 2-140
1981 Ed., § 45-2555.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Tenant Assistance Program Amendment Temporary Act of 1987 (D.C. Law 7-48, December 10, 1987, law notification 34 DCR 8107).